Hawaii statutes.
[§501-248] Jurisdiction for matters
pertaining to leasehold time share interests. The land court shall have
jurisdiction over all matters relating to instruments required by this part to
be registered pursuant to this chapter. Where any party is in doubt as to
whether an instrument must be registered, the question shall be referred to the
land court for decision; and the court, after notice to all parties and a
hearing, shall enter an order determining the question. Except as expressly
otherwise provided in this section, nothing in this part shall deprive the land
court of exclusive jurisdiction pursuant to section 501-101 over registered
land, or any interest therein, which is prior or superior to the interest of
the lessee of a leasehold time share interest. The circuit court shall have
jurisdiction, pursuant to section [603-21.5(a)(3)], over:

(1) All matters relating to instruments required by
this part to be recorded pursuant to chapter 502;

(2) All other matters pertaining to a leasehold time
share interest (except those in which jurisdiction is vested in the land court
pursuant to this section); and

(3) All matters as to which jurisdiction would
otherwise lie in the land court in part and in the circuit court in part. [L
1998, c 219, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next